Utah statutes.
48-2e-1001.   Direct action by partner.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a partner may maintain a direct action against another partner or the limited partnership, with or without an accounting as to the limited partnership's activities and affairs, to enforce the partner's rights and otherwise protect the partner's interests, including rights and interests under the partnership agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the partnership relationship.

(2)  A partner maintaining a direct action under this section must plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited partnership.

(3)  A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

